Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-116
Insect pests; plant diseases; control; cooperation with federal and state agencies.

The county board shall have power to cooperate with the Nebraska Department of Agriculture, the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, or the United States Department of Agriculture in the control or eradication of insect pests or plant diseases for the protection of agricultural or horticultural crops within the county and to expend money from the general fund for this purpose.

Laws 1941, c. 48, § 2, p. 237;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-105;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(12), p. 227;

R.S.1943, § 23-116;

Laws 1969, c. 146, § 1, p. 703;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 33.